Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 4. Medical Support for Children

§ 20-2-401.
Medical support to be included as part of child support order.

In any action to establish or modify a child support obligation, the court shall order either or both of the parents to provide medical support, which may include dental, optical or other health care needs for their dependent children. The court shall:

Require in the support order:

That one (1) or both parents shall provide insurance coverage for the children if insurance can be obtained at a reasonable cost and the benefits under the insurance policy are accessible to the children; and

That both parents be liable to pay any medical expenses not covered by insurance and any deductible amount on the required insurance coverage as cash medical support; or

Specify in the court order the proportion for which each parent will be liable for any medical expenses as cash medical support, which may include dental, optical or other health care expenses incurred by any person or agency on behalf of a child if the expenses are not covered by insurance.

When the insurance coverage is ordered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court shall order the obligated parent to submit to the court and to the other parent, or to the other parent’s representative, written proof that the insurance has been obtained or that application for insurability has been made within sixty (60) days after the entry of the order requiring insurance coverage. Proof of insurance coverage shall contain, at a minimum:

The name of the insurer;

The policy number;

The address to which all claims should be mailed;

A description of any restrictions on usage, such as preapproval for hospital admission, and the manner in which to obtain preapproval;

A description of all deductibles; and

Two (2) copies of claim forms.

The court shall order the obligated parent to notify the court and the other parent if insurance coverage for any child is denied, revoked, or altered in any way that would affect the other parent including any change relating to information required in subsection (b) of this section.

The court may hold an obligated parent in contempt for refusing to provide the ordered insurance, or for failing or refusing to provide the information required in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

In addition to enforcement by contempt, as provided for in subsection (d) of this section, the obligated parent is liable to the other parent, any person or agency for:

Part or all of the cost of medical care and medical insurance premiums paid or provided to a child for any period in which the obligated parent failed to provide required coverage;

Any direct insurance benefits received by the obligated parent and not used for the medical care of the child; and

Any reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in collection that the court may determine appropriate.

In any action to establish or modify a child support obligation and upon a sufficient showing by the department of family services that birth costs were paid by medical assistance within the preceding five (5) years, the court shall also order that the father pay birth costs to the department in the manner set forth in W.S.

14-2-1001

through

14-2-1008

. Failure of the department to make a sufficient showing under this subsection shall not preclude the department from subsequently seeking recovery in any other manner authorized by law.

If the department of family services has previously attempted to recover birth costs pursuant to W.S.

14-2-1001

through

14-2-1008

, the court is not required to issue the order described in subsection (f) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 51, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-301

; Laws 1990, ch. 15, § 2; Laws 1995, ch. 144, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

20-6-401

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 5; 2010, ch. 12, § 1; 2018 ch. 131, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to an uninsured child health insurance program for low income families, see §

35-25-101

et seq.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “at a reasonable cost and the benefits under the insurance policy are accessible to the children” for “through an employer or other group carrier, or if it is otherwise reasonably available” in (a)(i)(A); deleted “one (1) or” preceding “both parents” in (a)(i)(B), and inserted “as cash medical support” in (a)(i)(B) and (a)(ii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (f) and (g).

Attorney's fees.—

District court properly awarded the father attorney’s fees and costs incurred in responding to the mother’s Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60(b) motion where the mother continued to assert in her Rule 60(b) motion that the judgment was satisfied and that she was entitled to a credit for amounts that the father owed her, and there was nothing unreasonable in the conclusion that the father would have felt compelled to respond to the allegations as part of his effort to collect on the judgment. Olson v. Schriner, 2020 WY 36, 459 P.3d 453,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2020).

Trial court did not err in requiring that father obtain health insurance for minor children.

However, if insurance could not be acquired within the reasonable allocation of resources that he had, he was entitled to defend any contempt proceeding on the basis of reasonable efforts to obtain and to maintain insurance. Morehead v. Morehead, 811 P.2d 721,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1991).

Trial court did not err in requiring that father obtain health insurance for minor children. —

District court properly declined to determine what amount, if any, the father owed the mother for medical expenses, and thus, it did not abuse its discretion in declining to enter an order for a specific amount, because the amount, reasonableness, and necessity of the medical expenses for the child's care were not issues raised by the pleadings in the modification proceedings, and the district judge did no more than point out that expenses not covered by insurance were to be divided evenly under the existing decree.
Carbaugh v. Nichols, 2014 WY 2, 315 P.3d 1175,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2014).

Cited

in

Scaling v. Scaling, 805 P.2d 866,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 20-2-402.
Employer's obligations.

Where a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health coverage for a child, at the time of the order, which is offered by and available through an employer doing business in this state to the parent, the employer is required to comply with the following:

To permit the parent who has already met eligibility requirements, to enroll, under the family coverage, any child who is otherwise eligible for the coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;

If the parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, to permit enrollment of the child under family coverage upon application by the child’s other parent, the department of health in administering the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act or the department of family services in administering the child support enforcement program;

To transfer the national medical support notice to the appropriate group health plan providing the health care coverage for which the child is eligible within twenty (20) business days after the date of the national medical support notice;

To withhold from the employee’s compensation the employee’s share, if any, of premiums for health coverage and to pay this amount to the insurer;

Not to disenroll, or eliminate coverage of, the child unless the employee is no longer insured by that employer’s plan or the employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

The court or administrative order is no longer in effect;

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable health coverage which will take effect not later than the effective date of disenrollment;

The employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees; or

The employee is no longer working for the employer.

To notify the department within thirty (30) business days whenever the obligor’s employment is terminated. The notice shall include the following information:

When the obligor left the employment;

The last known address of the obligor;

The last known telephone number for the obligor; and

The name, address and telephone number of the obligor’s new employer, if known.

No employer shall use the existence of the medical child support order authorized by this act:

As grounds for discharge or discipline;

To otherwise penalize an obligor; or

As grounds to refuse to employ a person.

Any employer who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00). Any penalty collected under this section shall be distributed to the county public school fund in the county where the penalty was collected.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-402

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 5; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 2; 2004, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(iii), substituted “the date” for “receipt”; and added (a)(v)(D).

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), added “or” at the end of (v)(C); and made a related change in (B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-2-406(a)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 20-2-403.
Department of family services; duties of department and custodial parent; rules and regulations.

In IV-D cases where the noncustodial parent is required to provide health care coverage pursuant to a child support order, and for whom the employer is known, the department shall enforce the provision of court ordered health care coverage for dependent children, where appropriate, through the use of the national medical support notice as provided by federal or state law, unless alternate coverage is allowed by any order of the court or tribunal, including:

Cash contributions for health insurance coverage premiums through the custodial parent’s employment;

Private coverage, unrelated to the noncustodial parent’s employment.

The department shall transfer the national medical support notice to the employer within two (2) business days after an employee who is an obligor in a IV-D case is entered in the state directory of new hires.

The department shall promptly notify the employer when there is no longer a current order for medical support in effect for which the department is responsible.

The custodial parent, in consultation with the department, shall promptly select from available insurance plan options when the insurance plan administrator reports that there is more than one (1) option available under the plan, and shall take into consideration the income withholding of, and costs to, the obligor.

The department shall, through rules and regulations, develop procedures to determine when it is appropriate to utilize the national medical support notice.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 1.

§ 20-2-404.
Rights of obligor.

The obligor shall have twenty (20) days from the date of receipt of the national medical support notice within which to request a hearing. If the obligor does not request a hearing within twenty (20) days, the opportunity for a hearing may be deemed waived.

The request for hearing shall be made in writing to the court or tribunal having appropriate jurisdiction, with notice provided to the department, and shall state the basis upon which the hearing is requested.

The obligor may contest the withholding based on mistake of fact, according to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. Notwithstanding any contest by the obligor under this subsection, the employer shall initiate withholding until the employer receives notice from the department that withholding is no longer required. Any funds that are found to be inappropriately withheld shall be refunded to the obligor, if no arrearages exist, in accordance with rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 1; 2004, ch. 17, § 1.

§ 20-2-405.
Priorities of payment.

In IV-D cases in which an obligor is subject to income withholding for court ordered child support payments, health care coverage and any arrearages, and the amount of withholding allowed by law does not satisfy all withholding orders against the obligor, payment of current child support obligations shall be given priority in accordance with W.S.

20-6-215

.

After the requirements of W.S.

20-6-215

are met, health insurance premiums shall be prioritized by the court or tribunal on a case-by-case basis.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 1.

§ 20-2-406.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Department” means the department of family services;

“Employer” means any person who owes income to an obligor, including but not limited to, the United States government, a state government, any unit of local government and any school district;

“IV-D agency” means the department of family services or any other state’s IV-D agency as defined by that state;

“IV-D case” means a case with respect to a child in which support enforcement services are provided in accordance with Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act by the child support enforcement unit of the department to a custodian of a child who is a recipient of services under title 42, chapters 1, 2 or 4, of the Wyoming statutes [§§

42-1-101

et seq,

42-2-101

et seq., and

42-4-101

et seq.], or is a recipient of Title IV-E foster care. The term also includes any case in which a parent or custodian of a child applies to the child support enforcement unit of the department for support enforcement services and pays a fee for such services;

“Medical child support order” means an order, judgment or decree, including the approval of a settlement agreement, issued by a court or tribunal, requiring a parent to provide health care coverage for a child and which may require a payor to enroll the child in a health care benefit plan;

“Mistake of fact” means an error in the amount of current support or arrearages, in the identity of the obligor or that the order of support does not exist or has been vacated;

“National medical support notice” means the federally approved national medical support notice used to enforce the provision of health care coverage in IV-D cases for children of noncustodial parents who are required to provide health care coverage through an employment-related group health plan in accordance with a child support order;

“Obligor” means a person who owes a duty of support for a child;

“Payor” means any employer or other person who pays income to an obligor and who has or provides health care coverage to employees;

“Title IV-D” means Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act which established the federal child support enforcement program;

“Accessible” means the health care insurance plan is available and provides coverage for the child residing within the geographic area covered by the insurance plan;

“Cash medical support” means any child support order calculated pursuant to article 3 of this chapter, or an amount ordered to be paid toward the cost of health care coverage provided by another parent through the parent’s employer or otherwise, or for other medical costs not covered by insurance;

“Reasonable cost” means the cost to provide health care coverage or to provide cash medical support for children at no more than five percent (5%) of the providing party’s income, as defined in W.S. 20-2-303(a)(ii);

“This act” means W.S.

20-2-401

through

20-2-406

.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 1; 2010, ch. 12, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xi) through (a)(xiii) and renumbered (a)(xi) as (a)(xiv).

Social Security Act. —

Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, is compiled as 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq. Title IV-E is compiled as 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.